Illinois, session 104th, HB2684.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by adding 5Section 6-235 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/6-235 new)7    Sec. 6-235. Retirement Systems Reciprocal Act. The 8Retirement Systems Reciprocal Act, Article 20 of this Code, is 9adopted and made a part of this Article, but only with respect 10to a person who, on or after the effective date of this 11amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, is entitled 12under this Article to begin receiving a retirement annuity or 13survivor's annuity (as those terms are defined in Article 20) 14and who elects to proceed under the Retirement Systems 15Reciprocal Act. 16    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 17Section 8.49 as follows: 18    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)19    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 208 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 21the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory   HB2684- 2 -LRB104 11312 RPS 21398 b1Act of the 104th General Assembly.